District of Columbia statutes.
6-751.02

General requirements.

(a)

The owner of each new or existing dwelling unit, hotel, motel, hospital, nursing home, and residential-custodial care facility shall install smoke detectors as required by this subchapter. The Mayor shall install smoke detectors in each dwelling unit, hospital, nursing home, jail, prison, and residential-custodial care facility owned by the District of Columbia.

(b)

The owner of each dwelling unit, hotel, motel, hospital, nursing home, jail, prison, and residential-custodial care facility which is constructed or substantially rehabilitated under a building permit issued after September 30, 1978, shall install smoke detectors as required by this subchapter. No certificate of occupancy may be issued for any dwelling unit, hotel, motel, hospital, nursing home, or residential-custodial care facility unless smoke detectors have been installed as required by this subchapter.

(c)

The owner of each dwelling unit, hotel, motel, and hospital, except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section, shall install smoke detectors as required by this subchapter within 3 years of June 20, 1978.

(d)

The Mayor shall install smoke detectors, as required by this subchapter, in each dwelling unit, hospital, jail and prison owned by the District of Columbia, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, within 2 years of June 20, 1978.

(e)

Except as provided in subsection (b) and except as provided in § 14(d) of title VII of the Health Care and Community Residence Facilities Regulation, enacted June 14, 1974 (Reg. No. 74-15):

(1)

The owner of each residential-custodial care facility and nursing home shall install smoke detectors as required by this subchapter by January 1, 1980;

(2)

The Mayor shall install smoke detectors as required by this subchapter in each residential-custodial care facility and nursing home owned by the District of Columbia by January 1, 1980.

June 20, 1978, D.C. Law 2-81, § 3, 24 DCR 9050
Dec. 21, 1979, D.C. Law 3-42, § 2(a)-(e), 26 DCR 2082
1981 Ed., § 5-530.
1973 Ed., § 5-329.